New York, session 2025-2026, A7394.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 220 of the labor law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph m to read as follows: 3 m. "Public works" shall mean all fixed works constructed or demolished 4 by any public body or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds. 5 "Public works" shall include all projects financed in whole or in part 6 with bonds, grants, loans, or other funds made available by or through 7 the state or any of its political subdivisions. 8 § 2. Subdivision 1 and paragraph a of subdivision 2 of section 224-a 9 of the labor law, as added by section 1 of part FFF of chapter 58 of the 10 laws of 2020, are amended to read as follows: 11 1. Subject to the provisions of this section, each "covered project" 12 as defined in this section shall be subject to prevailing wage require- 13 ments in accordance with section two hundred twenty and two hundred 14 twenty-b of this article. A "covered project" shall mean construction 15 work done under contract which is paid for in whole or in part out of 16 public funds as such term is defined in this section [where the amount 17 of all such public funds, when aggregated, is at least thirty percent of 18 the total construction project costs and] where such project costs are EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09356-01-5 A. 7394 2 1 over five million dollars except as provided for by section two hundred 2 twenty-four-c of this article. 3 a. The payment of money, by a public entity, or a third party acting 4 on behalf of and for the benefit of a public entity, directly to or on 5 behalf of the contractor, subcontractor, developer or owner [that is not 6 subject to repayment]; 7 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.